Maryland, session 2025, HB0092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
9A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Heating, Ventilation, Air–Conditioning, and
Refrigeration Contractors.
(l) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued
by the Board to provide or to assist in providing heating, ventilation, air–conditioning, or
refrigeration services.
(2) “License” includes, unless the context requires otherwise:
(i) a master license;
(ii) a master restricted license;
– 1 –

Ch. 85 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) a limited license;
(iv) a journeyman license;
(v) a journeyman restricted license; and
(vi) an apprentice license.
9A–309.
(e) (1) If application for restoration is made within [90 days of] 4 YEARS
AFTER expiration of a license, the license may be restored [only] on payment of [a] THE
REQUIRED renewal OR REINSTATEMENT fee.
(2) If application for restoration is not made within the [90–day] 4–YEAR
period, the Board may require compliance with the process for initial applications as if the
applicant had never been licensed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –